Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Chapter 4. Mississippi Military Family Relief Fund

§ 33-4-1.
Mississippi Military Family Relief Fund created; money in fund under direction of Military Department; use of funds; eligibility requirements.

A special fund to be designated the “Mississippi Military Family Relief Fund” is created in the State Treasury. The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state. The fund shall consist of any money designated for deposit therein from any source, including, but not limited to, money designated for deposit therein by Section 27-7-94, and private contributions. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into the fund. Money in the fund shall be under the direction of the military department. Such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration, based upon recommendations made by the Adjutant General. Money in the fund shall be utilized to make grants to families that experience a financial hardship as a result of a family member who is a member of the Mississippi National Guard or is a Mississippi resident and member of the Reserves of the Armed Forces of the United States. The Adjutant General shall establish eligibility requirements for receipt of the grants and the amount of the grants by rule.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 6, § 1 effective from and after passage June 14, 2005; Laws, 2007, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 436, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.